New York, session 2025-2026, A1381.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of section 1105 of the tax law, as 2 amended by chapter 72 of the laws of 1971, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 On and after June first, nineteen hundred seventy-one, there is hereby 5 imposed and there shall be paid a tax of four percent; provided, howev- 6 er, that when the goods or services are purchased from a business which 7 employs twenty or less persons, is resident in this state, is independ- 8 ently owned and operated and is not dominant in its field, the amount of 9 tax paid on such sale shall be two percent, upon: 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first day of the sales tax 11 quarterly period, as described in subdivision (b) of section 1136 of the 12 tax law, next commencing at least 90 days after this act shall have 13 become a law and shall apply in accordance with the applicable transi- 14 tional provisions of sections 1106 and 1217 of the tax law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02812-01-5